Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 18.1 Rhode Island Nursery Law

2-18.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known by the short title of “The Rhode Island nursery law”.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-1

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-2.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agent” means any person under the partial or full control of a nursery worker, dealer or other agent, who sells or solicits orders for nursery stock, not from a supply at hand, at a place other than a nursery worker’s or a dealer’s place of business.

“Certified stock” means plants and plant parts defined as nursery stock which bears, or with regard to which the director has determined to his or her satisfaction that there has been issued by recognized plant regulatory officials, a valid, unexpired
certificate attesting that the stock has been inspected and found to be apparently free of injurious insects and plant diseases.

“Collected plants” means plants and plant parts defined as nursery stock, which are dug or otherwise removed from fields, woodlots, or forest lands for sale or distribution which have not been grown under cultivation in a nursery for one year.

“Dealer” means any person, not a grower or an original producer of nursery stock in this state, and who is independent of the control of any nursery worker or other dealer, who sells, offers to sell, solicits orders for or otherwise traffics in nursery
stock from a supply at hand or which is obtained from a nursery or another dealer.

“Department” means the department of environmental management of the state of Rhode Island.

“Director” means the director of environmental management of the state of Rhode Island, and his or her authorized agents.

“Hardy” means the ability to withstand heat or cold to the extent of surviving the normal out of door summer and winter temperatures of this state.

“Insect” means invertebrate animals belonging to the arthropod class, Insecta (Hexapoda), and also members of other arthropod classes, mollusca, nematodes, and other invertebrate animals, in any state of development. An insect species shall be considered
to be injurious to plants:

When it is known to be capable of causing serious damage to, or decreased value of, the host plant or adjacent plants by reason of feeding, oviposition, production of toxic secretions, or other activities and by the demonstrated capacity to function efficiently
as a carrier or reservoir of an agent capable of inciting an injurious plant disease; or

When the insect has been declared by the director to be a plant pest, or when a quarantine has been established with regard to it by the director, the secretary of agriculture of the United States, or by recognized plant regulatory officials of the state
or country into which the host plants are to be shipped.

“Nursery” means any grounds or premises on or in which nursery stock is propagated, grown, or cultivated, or from which nursery stock is collected for sale purposes. The term nursery shall not be construed to mean a dealer’s premises or heeling-in grounds
on or in which nursery stock is held for purposes other than propagation or growth and neither shall it apply to grounds or premises offering for sale stock which is not a regular commercial activity.

“Nursery stock” means all hardy, deciduous and evergreen trees, shrubs, vines and other plants having a persistent woody stem, whether wild or cultivated, and plant parts, for and capable of propagation.

“Nursery worker” means the person who owns, leases, manages, or is in charge of a nursery. All persons engaged in operating a nursery are farmers and are engaged in an agricultural enterprise for all statutory purposes.

“Person” means a corporation, company, society, association, partnership, governmental agency, and any individual or combination of individuals.

“Place of business” means each separate store, stand, sales ground, lot, truck, railway car, or other vehicle or any other place at or from which nursery stock is being sold or offered for sale where one or more sales persons are in attendance.

“Plant disease” means an injurious physiological activity of plants caused by the continued action of a chief causal factor and exhibited through abnormal cellular activity expressed in characteristic conditions, called symptoms, which symptoms are of
three (3) types, nocrosis, hyperplasia, and hypoplasia. Plant disease shall be considered to be injurious in nature:

When the symptoms and signs observed on and/or the inciting agent(s), recovered from or demonstrated to be in the plant identify the disease as one that is considered by competent plant pathologists to be capable of causing serious damage to or decreased
value of the host plant or of adjacent plants;

When the symptoms observed, whether incited by animate or inanimate causal factors, and whether or not identified with known plant disease(s) are of a nature and intensity as to reduce the likelihood of surviving normal transplantation or of maintaining
growth, vigor, and appearance equal to that of normal nursery grown plants of the same species, age, and size when properly transplanted and cared for; and

When the incitant or harborer of the disease has been declared by the director to be a plant pest, or when a quarantine has been established with regard to it by the director, the secretary of agriculture of the United States, or by plant regulatory officials
of the country or state into which the host plants are to be shipped.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-2

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-3.
Authority to inspect — Access to nursery, heeling-in grounds or other place of business.

For the purpose of making inspections and carrying out the provisions of this chapter and any rule and regulation made in pursuance of this chapter, the director or his or her authorized agents have free access at any reasonable hour to any nursery, heeling-in
grounds, place of business, or other public or private premises, except dwelling quarters, where it may be necessary for them to go, or which it may be necessary for them to inspect in the performance of their duties. It is unlawful
to deny access to the director or his or her authorized agents, or to thwart or hinder these inspections by misrepresenting or concealing facts or conditions.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-3

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-4.
Inspection of nursery stock before sale or distribution.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, to offer for sale, to distribute or cause to be distributed from a nursery or other premises, any nursery stock, until the nursery stock has been officially inspected by the director and certified as apparently free
from injurious insects and plant diseases, or unless there has been issued with regard to that nursery stock, by an authorized plant regulatory official of another state, or the federal government, a valid certificate attesting to
freedom from injurious insects and plant diseases.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-4

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-5.
Shipments from foreign countries.

Any person receiving any nursery stock from a foreign country shall immediately notify the director of the arrival of the shipment, the contents, and the name and address of the consignor, and shall hold the shipment for at least ninety-six (96) hours
to enable the director to make an official inspection of the nursery stock.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-5

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-6.
Nursery inspection and certification.

It is the duty of the director to inspect at least once each year during the growing season, all nurseries in the state of Rhode Island to ascertain whether they are infested with injurious insect pests or infected with injurious plant diseases. If upon
the inspection of any nursery it appears that the nursery and the nursery stock are apparently free from injurious insects and plant diseases, it is the duty of the director to issue to the owner of the nursery, or the person in
charge of the nursery, a certificate setting forth the fact of the inspection and freedom from injurious insects and plant diseases. Conversely, if inspection of any nursery and the stock reveals the presence of injurious insects
and/or plant diseases, the owner or person in charge of the nursery shall take any measures to suppress or eradicate these injurious insects and/or plant diseases that the director prescribes, and a certificate shall not be issued
until the director, by subsequent inspections, determines that the nursery and stock are apparently free from injurious insects and plant diseases.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the director may refuse to inspect and certify a nursery if the nursery, for lack of care or neglect, is in such condition that it cannot be adequately inspected.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-6

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-7.
Certificates.

Nursery inspection certificates issued by the director shall bear the date of issue and be valid until the fifteenth of September following their issuances. The director limits the expiration date whenever it is necessary to insure freedom from pests
of the nursery stock so inspected and certified, and, in the case of stock that is shipped out of state, it is permissible to designate a different expiration date when the date has been agreed upon in writing between the director
and the plant regulatory officials of the state of destination.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-7

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-8.
What nursery stock may be offered for sale.

Only certified nursery stock, stored or displayed under conditions which will maintain its vigor shall be offered for sale. Offering for sale of dead nursery stock or of stock so seriously weakened by drying, excessive heat or cold or any other condition
that makes it unable to grow satisfactorily when given reasonable care is deemed a violation of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-8

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-9.
Nursery worker’s licenses — Nonlicensed growers.

No person shall engage as a nursery worker in this state without first obtaining a nursery worker’s license from the department. The license expires on March 31 of each year, and application for renewal of license shall be made annually prior to that
date. Applications for license or renewal of license shall be in writing, on a form prescribed by the department, and be accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00). Each applicant for a nursery worker’s license shall certify
that he or she will buy and distribute only nursery stock which has been officially inspected and certified and that he or she will, on request of the department, furnish a list of all sources from which he or she secures nursery
stock and of all of his or her places of business where he or she sells that stock. No license is transferable.

Any park, arboretum, forestry department, or any other state or municipal agency growing nursery stock solely for use on its own property or in connection with public reforestation projects are exempt from obtaining a license and are not considered to
be operating commercial nurseries, but are required to register annually with the director, and are made subject to any of the inspection and the certification requirements of this chapter that may apply.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-9

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 22, § 4.

2-18.1-10.
Dealer’s license.

Every dealer, before offering nursery stock for sale or distribution or soliciting orders for nursery stock in Rhode Island, shall obtain a dealer’s license for each place of business from the department. The license expires on March 31 of each year,
and application for renewal of a license shall be made annually prior to that date. A dealer’s license is nontransferable. Applications for license or renewal of a license shall be in writing on a form prescribed by the department,
and be accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00). Each applicant for a license certifies that he or she will buy and distribute only nursery stock which has been officially inspected and certified, and that he or she will maintain
with the department a list of all sources from which he or she secures nursery stock and all places of business which he or she maintains.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-10

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 22, § 4.

2-18.1-11.
Reasons for withholding or revoking a license or certificate.

The director may withhold, suspend or revoke any license or certificate of inspection provided that upon ten (10) days’ notice, in writing, forwarded by registered or certified mail to the applicant or holder of the license or certificate, stating the
contemplated action and in general the grounds for the action, and after reasonable opportunity to be heard, the director shall find that the person has:

Made any material misstatement in his or her application for license;

Failed to comply with the requirements of the director with reference to freeing his or her nursery stock of injurious insect pests and plant diseases;

Failed to provide adequate facilities for storing or displaying nursery stock being offered for sale under conditions needed to maintain its vigor; or

Knowingly permitted the use of his or her license or certificate by another person.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-11

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-12.
Reinstatement of license or certificate.

The director may grant or reinstate any license or certificate of inspection which has been withheld, suspended or revoked if the conditions which incited the withholding, suspension or revocation have been corrected and the director is satisfied, as
a result of investigation, that the conditions are not likely to recur.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-12

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-13.
Registration of agents.

Every agent selling or soliciting orders for nursery stock in Rhode Island must be registered with the department by his or her principal.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-13

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-14.
Reciprocal agreements.

Nursery workers, dealers, or other persons residing or doing business in another state, desiring to sell or solicit orders for nursery stock in this state, are, upon complying with all other provisions of this chapter and all rules and regulations promulgated
under this chapter, and upon payment of the fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), entitled to a dealer’s license permitting those persons and/or their registered agents to sell or solicit orders for certified nursery stock within this
state.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the director may enter into reciprocal agreements with the responsible plant regulatory officials of other states for the recognition of official inspection certificates, under which certified nursery stock owned by nursery
workers, dealers or other persons from those states may be sold and delivered in this state without the payment of a Rhode Island license fee, if like privileges are accorded to Rhode Island nursery workers and dealers in those
other states, and the department finds that those other states, before issuing official inspection certificates require inspection equal to that required in Rhode Island, except that any nonresident nursery worker, dealer, or other
person having a place of business in this state shall obtain a dealer’s license and pay all license fees as required in this chapter.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-14

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 131, § 1.

2-18.1-15.
Nonresidents.

Nonresident nursery workers, dealers and other persons, wishing to ship nursery stock into Rhode Island, whether or not licensed as dealers in Rhode Island, shall first file with the director a copy of a valid, unexpired certificate showing that the stock
sold by that person has been officially inspected and found to be apparently free of injurious insects and plant diseases or to supply any other evidence that the director may set forth as being equivalent to the filing of certificate,
and shall, if required by the director, comply with any regulations that the director may designate, regarding the use of uniform shipping tags, or any other regulations that the director may prescribe to facilitate the enforcement
of this chapter. The director may require the nonresident nursery workers, dealers or other persons to notify him or her of the date of shipping, and the destination of nursery stock intended for any consignee within this state.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-15

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-16.
Collected plants.

No collected plants shall be transported within this state or placed in any nursery or in close proximity to any certified nursery stock unless they have first been inspected and found to be apparently free of injurious insects and plant disease. Inspection
of collected plant stock shall be made after digging or removal from the native habitat, and shall be made in a place designated by the director.

The director may require that all collected stock be labelled as collected stock until the plants have been grown under cultivation in a nursery for one calendar year.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-16

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-17.
Horticultural services.

The licensing and registration requirements of this chapter do not apply to any licensed arborist, landscape architect, private gardener, or servant on private estates, whose function is that of providing services, when obtaining or transporting certified
nursery stock for which the nursery worker’s or dealer’s price has been paid in full by his or her employer or master.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-17

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-18.
Labelling imported stock.

All nursery stock shipped into this state from any country, state, commonwealth, province, territory, or the District of Columbia, shall bear on each box, package, bale, container, bundle, or other unit, a certificate of inspection, its facsimile, or
an official tag, stating that the nursery stock contained within or bundled has been inspected by an authorized plant regulatory officer of the state of origin or of the United States department of agriculture, and that the stock
was found to be free from all injurious insects and plant diseases. Any container or bundle bearing a certificate of fumigation or other treatment which meets the requirements specified in regulations made under the authority of
§

2-18.1-21

may be accepted as though bearing a proper certificate of inspection.

In case nursery stock is brought into this state without the required certificate of inspection or treatment, the consignee is required to return it to the consignor at the expense of the latter.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-18

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-19.
Common carrier.

No transportation company or common carrier shall accept for transportation within this state, or deliver any box, bundle, package, bale, container, or other unit containing or consisting of nursery stock to any consignee within the state, unless the
container or package has attached to it a copy of the official tag or certificate of inspection as required by this chapter and the regulations of the director. No common carrier or transportation company is liable for damages to the
consignee or consignor for refusing to receive, transport or deliver any box, bundle, package, bale, container, or other unit containing or consisting of nursery stock to any consignee within the state, when not accompanied by the
required tag or certificate. In case any nursery stock is shipped within this state without the certificate plainly affixed, the fact must be promptly reported to the department by the carrier, stating the consignor and the consignee
and the nature of the shipment, and the carrier may be required to hold the shipment subject to the order of the director.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-19

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-20.
Inspection of imported stock — Disposition of infested stock.

The director has the power to inspect at the point of destination all nursery stock coming into the state, whether under certificate or not, and should the stock be found infested with any injurious insects or plant diseases, he or she shall cause it
to be destroyed, returned to the consignor, or subjected to any disinfecting or disinfesting procedure that he or she specifies, and the state is not liable to the consignor for expenses of shipping or treatment or for any damage which
he or she may suffer through that action.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-20

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-21.
Treatment.

The director may designate by rule or regulation any fumigation or other disinfestation or disinfection procedures, the carrying out of which, when certified to, or sworn to, in a manner and under any conditions that he or she specifies, will be acceptable
to him or her in place of the customary certificate of inspection.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-21

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-22.
Misrepresentation.

It is unlawful for any person to misrepresent, by name or otherwise, that he or she is a nursery worker or conducts a nursery business when this is not the case. This shall not apply to any person, firm, or corporation on record as doing business and
building good will under this type of name prior to February 1, 1963.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-22

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-23.
Enforcement.

It is the duty of the director of environmental management to enforce the provisions of this chapter, and all other laws for the inspection of orchards, nurseries, and other trees and shrubs and the protection of these objects from injurious insects and
plant diseases.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-23

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-24.
Additional authority of the director.

The director is authorized and empowered:

To make rules and regulations for carrying out the provisions of this chapter;

To employ any assistants necessary to enable him or her to discharge his or her duty in carrying out the provisions of this chapter; and

To grant special shipping certificates to residents of this state on individual shipments of nursery stock or other plants and plant products in compliance with the plant inspection and plant quarantine regulations of the state of destination.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-24

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-24.1.
License fees — Apportionment.

One-fifth (1/5) of all license fees received by the director under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid over to the general treasurer and deposited within the general fund, and four-fifths (4/5) of the funds collected shall be deposited into a
separate fund within the general fund to be called the “nursery, feed and fertilizer quality testing fund,” administered by the general treasurer in accordance with the same laws and fiscal procedures as the general fund of the
state. This fund consists of all nursery worker’s license fees, dealers’ license fees, and fertilizer registration fees paid pursuant to §§

2-18.1-9

,

2-18.1-10

,

2-7-4

and

2-7-6

.

That proportion of moneys placed in the nursery, feed and fertilizer testing fund collected from §§

2-18.1-9

and

2-18.1-10

are available immediately, and are specifically appropriated to the director for the following purpose, for payment of ancillary services, personnel and equipment incurred in order to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

History of Section.
P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 22, § 5.

2-18.1-25.
Review of orders.

Any person affected by any order made or served pursuant to this chapter may have a review of the order by the director and from his or her decision may appeal to the courts for the purpose of having the order modified or suspended. Application for review
may be made to the director, in writing, within ten (10) days after the receipt of the order and the review shall be allowed and considered by the director at any time and place that the director may prescribe.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-25

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-26.
Penalties for violations.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter with reference to:

The sale, distribution, receipt or delivery of nursery stock which has not been inspected and certified;

The sale or offering for sale of nursery stock without first obtaining a license as provided for in this chapter;

The use of a license or a certificate of inspection after it has been revoked or suspended or has expired;

The use of a license or certificate of inspection belonging to another person;

The offering of any hindrance or resistance to the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter; or

The violation of any other provision of this chapter, or any rule or regulation of the director made in pursuance of this chapter;

shall, upon conviction, be adjudged guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each and every offense.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-26

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-27.
Prosecution of offenses.

All prosecutions of violations under the provisions of this chapter shall be instituted by the director and be directed by him or her, and all penalties recovered for the violation of any provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the treasury of the
state. In prosecutions for violation of any provisions of this chapter commenced by the director, it is not necessary that he or she enter into recognizance or give surety for costs to prosecute these violations.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-27

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.

2-18.1-28.
Severability.

If any section, sentence, clause, phrase, or other portion of this chapter is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, the decision does not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-18.1-28

, as assigned, P.L. 1962, ch. 132, § 1.